Washington statutes.
RCW 36.47.020

Joint action by officers of each county.

It shall be the duty of the assessor, auditor, clerk, coroner, sheriff, superintendent of schools, treasurer, and prosecuting attorney of each county in the state, including appointive officials in charter counties heading like departments, to take such action as they jointly deem necessary to effect the coordination of the administrative programs of each county.

[ 1998 c 245 s 28; 1969 ex.s. c 5 s 1; 1963 c 4 s 36.47.020. Prior: 1959 c 130 s 2.]